Washington statutes.
RCW 1.90.100

Personal income tax prohibition.

Neither the state nor any county, city, or other local jurisdiction in the state of Washington may tax any individual person on any form of personal income. For the purposes of this chapter, "income" has the same meaning as "gross income" in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 61.

[ 2024 c 5 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 2111).]